src/fst/phonology.twolc
"õ2õ̭"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 õ:õ̭ <=>  [ # Cns* | Cns ] _ õ: ( s | %{sś%}: | t | %{tt́%}: | k | %{kḱ%}: | l | %{lĺ%}: | n | %{nń%}: | r (%{dd́Ø%}:|%{tt́Ø%}:) | %{rŕ%}: | m | %{mḿ%}: | %{td%}: s | %{td%}: %{sś%}: | r t: | r %{tt́%}: | v | %{vv́%}:) (HarmDummiesVar) %^VOWRaise: ;
 [ # Cns* | Cns ] õ: _ [ s | %{sś%}: | t | %{tt́%}: | k | %{kḱ%}: | l | %{lĺ%}: | n | %{nń%}: | r | %{rŕ%}: | m | %{mḿ%}: | %{td%}: s | %{td%}: %{sś%}: | r t: | r %{tt́%}: | v | %{vv́%}:] (HarmDummiesVar) %^VOWRaise: ;
 [ # Cns* | Cns ] õ: _ (HarmDummiesVar) %^VOWRaise: [#|.#.|%>|%-] ;
  > OnSetC  _ CnsInZero: a (HarmDummiesVar) (%^WGStem:) ;
!!€ sõda%{back%}%^WGStem
!!€ sõ̭0a00


"o2u̬"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 o:u̬ <=>  [ # Cns* | Cns ] _ o: ( s | %{sś%}: | t | %{tt́%}: | %{gǵ%}: | %{pṕb%}: | %{dd́%}: | %{vv́%}: | %{ff́%}:| k | %{kḱ%}: | l (%{dd́Ø%}:|%{tt́Ø%}:) | %{lĺ%}: | n | %{nń%}: | r (%{dd́Ø%}:|%{tt́Ø%}:) | %{rŕ%}: | m | %{mḿ%}: | %{td%}: s | %{td%}: %{sś%}: | r t: | r %{tt́%}: | v | %{vv́%}:) (HarmDummiesVar) %^VOWRaise: ;
 [ # Cns* | Cns ] o: _ [ s | %{sś%}: | t | %{tt́%}: | %{gǵ%}: | %{pṕb%}: | %{dd́%}: | %{vv́%}: | %{ff́%}:| k | %{kḱ%}: | l (%{dd́Ø%}:|%{tt́Ø%}:) | %{lĺ%}: | n | %{nń%}: | r (%{dd́Ø%}:|%{tt́Ø%}:) | %{rŕ%}: | m | %{mḿ%}: | %{td%}: s | %{td%}: %{sś%}: | r t: | r %{tt́%}: | v | %{vv́%}: ] (HarmDummiesVar) %^VOWRaise: ;
 [ # Cns* | Cns ] o: _ (HarmDummiesVar) %^VOWRaise: [#|.#.|%>|%-] ;

"Vx%{ou%}:Vyo"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 Vx:Vy <=> 
 [ # Cns* | Cns |Vow ] _ Vx: [ Cns (Cns) | ArchCns: ( ArchCns: | Cns: ) | Cns ArchCns: ] [ (HarmDummiesVar) %^VOWLower: | [ Vow: | ArchVow: ] ( ArchCns: | ArchCns: Cns | Cns) (HarmDummiesVar) %^Pen: %^VOWLower: ] ;
 [ # Cns* | Cns |Vow ] Vx: _ [ Cns (Cns) | ArchCns: ( ArchCns: | Cns: ) | Cns ArchCns: ] [ (HarmDummiesVar) %^VOWLower: | [ Vow: | ArchVow: ] ( ArchCns: | ArchCns: Cns | Cns) (HarmDummiesVar) %^Pen: %^VOWLower: ];

!! hoolas+A+Sg+Nom:
!!€ h%{ou%}%{ou%}la%{sØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^G1
!!€ hoolas00000
!! Toomas+N+Prop+Sg+Nom
!!€ T{ou}{ou}ma{sØ}{back}^Pen^VOWLower^Pen^WGStem^StrGStem
!!€ Toomas000000
 [ # Cns* | Cns ] Vx: _ (HarmDummiesVar) %^VOWLower: (%^WGStem:|%^G1:) [#|.#.|%>|%-] ;
 [ # Cns* | Cns ] _ Vx: (HarmDummiesVar) %^VOWLower: (%^WGStem:|%^G1:) [ %^VowRM:|%^OO2Õ:|#|.#.|%>|%-] ;
!  [ # Cns* | Cns ] _ Vx: ( ArchCns: | Cns | ArchCns: ArchCns: | Cns ArchCns:) Vow: ( Cns:+ | %{sØ%}: | %{hØ%}: ) (HarmDummiesVar) %^VOWLower: ;
! [ # Cns* | Cns ] Vx: _ [ ArchCns: | Cns | ArchCns: ArchCns: | Cns ArchCns:] Vow: ( Cns:+ | %{sØ%}: | %{hØ%}: ) (HarmDummiesVar) %^VOWLower: ;
         where Vx in (%{ou%} %{öü%} %{õy%} %{ei%} )
               Vy in (  o      ö      õ      e ) matched ;

"Vx%{ou%}2Vyu̬"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 Vx:Vy <=>
 [ # Cns* | Cns |Vow] _ Vx: ( ArchCns: | ArchCns:  ArchCns: | Cns (Cns) | Cns ArchCns:) ( Vow: | ArchVow: ) (HarmDummiesVar) %^VOWRaise: ;
 [ # Cns* | Cns |Vow] Vx: _ [ ArchCns: | ArchCns:  ArchCns: | Cns (Cns) | Cns ArchCns: ] ( Vow: | ArchVow: ) (HarmDummiesVar) %^VOWRaise: ;
!
 [ # Cns* | Cns ] Vx: _ (HarmDummiesVar) %^VOWRaise: [#|.#.|%>|%-] ;
!! nuuĺ+N+Sg+Nom: **arrow**
!!€ n%{ou%}%{ou%}%{lĺ%}%{back%}%^VOWRaise%^PAL
!!€ nu̬u̬ĺ000
  [ # Cns* | Cns ] _ Vx: ( ArchCns: | Cns (Cns) | ArchCns: ArchCns: | Cns+ ArchCns: ) [ Vow: | ArchVow: | ArchVow: ArchCns: ] ( Cns:+ |ArchCns: Cns | %{sØ%}: | %{hØ%}: ) (HarmDummiesVar) %^Pen: %^VOWRaise: ;
 [ # Cns* | Cns ] Vx: _ [ ArchCns: | Cns (Cns) | ArchCns: ArchCns: | Cns+ ArchCns: ] [ Vow: | ArchVow: | ArchVow: ArchCns: ] ( Cns:+ |ArchCns: Cns | %{sØ%}: | %{hØ%}: ) (HarmDummiesVar) %^Pen: %^VOWRaise: ;
!
  [ # Cns* | Cns ] _ Vx: ( ArchCns: | Cns (Cns) | ArchCns: ArchCns: | Cns ArchCns: ) (HarmDummiesVar)  %^VOWRaise: ;
!  [ # Cns* | Cns ] _ Vx: [ ArchCns: | Cns (Cns) | ArchCns: ArchCns: | Cns ArchCns: ] (HarmDummiesVar)  %^VOWRaise: ;
 [ # Cns* | Cns ] Vx: _ [ ArchCns: | Cns (Cns) | ArchCns: ArchCns: | Cns ArchCns: ]  (HarmDummiesVar)  %^VOWRaise: ;
!! juuma+V+Pss+Cond+ConNegI: **drink/juoda**
!!€ j{ou}{ou}{back}^VOWRaise^VowRM>vv{aä}>siq
!!€ ju̬0000>vva>siq

!juuḱ
     	  where Vx in (%{ou%} %{öü%} %{õy%} %{ei%} )
	  	Vy in ( u̬ ü̬ õ̭ i̬ ) matched ;
!! kiiĺ+N+Sg+Gen: **tongue/kieli**
!!€ k%{ei%}%{ei%}{lĺ}%{front%}%^VOWRaise%^PAL
!!€ ki̬i̬ĺ000
!!kiirdlemä+V:
!!€ k%{ei%}%{ei%}r%{dØ%}%{eØ%}%{lĺ%}%{front%}%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^VowRM%>%{eõ%}%>m%{aä%}
!!€ ki̬i̬rd0l00000%>e%>mä
!echo 'k {ei}:i {ei}:i r {dØ}:d {eØ}:0 {lĺ}:l {front}:0 ^Pen:0 ^VOWRaise:0 ^Pen:0 ^VowRM:0 > {eõ}:e > m {aä}:ä' | hfst-pair-test src/fst/phonology.compose.hfst

"i2e"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 i:e <=> Cns _ (HarmDummiesVar) (%^StrGStem: ) %^PLPRT: ;
! Cns 0:? _ (HarmDummiesVar) (  %^StrGStem: ) %^PLPRT: ;
!! pini+N+Pl+Par: **dog/koira**
!!€ pi%{nØ%}ni%{front%}%^Pen%^StrGStem%^VowRM%>%{eõ%}
!!€ pinn00000%>e
! # Cns* _ i: l (HarmDummiesVar) %^VOWLower: ;
! # Cns* i: _ l (HarmDummiesVar) %^VOWLower: ;
!! kiiĺ+N+Sg+Gen: **tongue/kieli**
!!€ k%{ei%}%{ei%}{lĺ}%{front%}%^VOWLower%^NoPAL%>%{eõ%}
!!€ keel000%>e
     e _ [Cns:|%{bv%}:] (HarmDummiesVar) %^ÄI2ÄÄ: ;
!! leib+N+Sg+Gen: **bread/leipä**
!!€ lei{bv}{front}^ÄI2ÄÄ^WGStem>{aä}
!!€ leev000>ä
  Cns* _ %{tdØ%}: ä: (HarmDummiesVar) %^Pen: %^VOWLower: ;
!!pidämä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: 
!!€ pi%{tdØ%}ä%{front%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^VowRM%{eõ%}%>t%{aä%}s
!!€ pe00000000e%>täs


"i:ä"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 i:ä <=> ä _ Cns: (HarmDummiesVar) %^ÄI2ÄÄ: ;
!! päiv+N+Sg+Gen: **day/päivä**
!!€ päiv%{front%}%^ÄI2ÄÄ%>ä
!!€ pääv00%>ä


"a2o"!prepare for deprication to {ao}:o
!! **@RULENAME@**
!! ```
 a:o <=> OnSetC  _ (HarmDummiesVar) ( %^StrGStem: | PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem: ) %^PLPRT: ;
!!€ ka%{nØ%}na%{back%}%^Pen%^StrGStem%^PLPRT
!!€ kanno0000
!! ```

"{ao}o"
!! **@RULENAME@**
!! ```
 %{ao%}:o <=> OnSetC  _ (HarmDummiesVar) ( %^G4: | %^G3: |PenVOWHite PenGRAD) %^PLPRT: ;
!!€ ka%{nØ%}n%{ao%}%{back%}%^G3%^PLPRT
!!€ kanno000
!! ```



!! ### VOWEL LOSS
"a:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 a:0 <=>
  [ Cns: | :Cns | ArchCns:] _ (s:|%{sś%}:|%{sØ%}:|%{rŕ%}:|%{lĺ%}:|r |l) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite [ PenGRAD (PenPAL) [ %^VowRM: | %^Pen:0 %^JI2I: | %^Pen: %^VowRM:]| CnsInZero: %^VowRM: %^WGStem:  %> | [%^StrGStem:  ] %> i  ] ;  
!  [ Cns: | :Cns | ArchCns:] _ (s:|%{sś%}:) (HarmDummiesVar) (PenVOWHite) [ (%^Pen: %^CC2C:|%^Pen: %^StrGStem:|%^Pen: %^G2:| %^Pen: %^WGStem:) (%^Pen: %^NoPAL:) [ %^VowRM: | %^Pen: %^VowRM:]| CnsInZero: %^VowRM: %^WGStem:  %> | [%^StrGStem: ] %> i  ] ; 
[ Cns:| ArchCns: ] _ (HarmDummiesVar) [ (%^StrGStem:|PenVOWHite [%^Pen: %^WGStem:| PenPAL ] |%^Pen: %^CC2C:|%^Pen: %^G2:) %^VowRM: | CnsInZero: %^VowRM: %^WGStem: %> ]  ; 
! [ Cns:| ArchCns: ] _ (HarmDummiesVar) [ (%^StrGStem:|PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem:|%^Pen: %^CC2C:) (0:) %^VowRM: | CnsInZero: %^VowRM: %^CnsRM: %> ]  ; 
      a _ (HarmDummiesVar) %>  i  ; !!= @CODE@ 
!!€ saa%{back%}%>i
!!€ sa00%>i
!! sõimama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ sõima%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^VowRM%>ssi
!!€ sõim0000000%>ssi
  [Cns:| ArchCns: ]  _ Cns: (HarmDummiesVar) %^Pen: %^VowRM: ;
!!€ puhkas%{back%}%^Pen%^VowRM%>a%>ma
!!€ puhk0s000%>a%>ma
  _  [%{hØ%}: | %{sØ%}:] (HarmDummiesVar) %^VowRM:  ;
    _ (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite PenGRAD PenPAL %^VowRM: ;
!    _ (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite (%^Pen: (%^WGStem:|%^StrGStem:|%^G4:|%^G3:)) (%^Pen %^NoPAL:) %^VowRM: ;
!! võtma+V+Inf/mA: **to take/ottaa**
!!€ võ{tØ}{tt́}a{back}^Pen^WGStem^Pen^NoPAL^VowRM>m{aä}
!!€ võ0t0000000>ma
!! võtma+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **to take/ottaa**
!!€ võ{tØ}{tt́}a{back}^Pen^StrGStem^Pen^PAL^VowRM
!!€ võtt́0000000

!! sõda+N+Pl+Par:
!!€ sõ%{tØ%}%{tdØ%}a%{back%}%^Pen%^G3%^VowRM%>o
!!€ sõ0t00000%>o

"ä:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 ä:0 <=>  [ Cns: | :Cns | ArchCns:] _ (s:|%{sś%}:|%{sØ%}:|%{rŕ%}:|%{lĺ%}:|r|l) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite [PenGRAD (PenPAL) [ %^VowRM:| %^Pen:0 %^JI2I: | %^Pen: %^VowRM:]| CnsInZero: %^VowRM: %^WGStem:  %> | [%^StrGStem:  ] %> i  ] ;
   [ Cns: | :Cns | ArchCns:] _ (s:|%{sś%}:|%{rŕ%}:|%{lĺ%}:) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite [ PenGRAD PenPAL [ %^Pen: %^VowRM:|%^VowRM:]| CnsInZero: %^VowRM: %^WGStem:  %> | [%^StrGStem:  ] %> i  ] ; 
!p ü {kgØ}:g ä:0 {front}:0 ^Pen:0 ^G2:0 ^VowRM:0 > i
!! pügämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc:
!!€ pü%{kgØ%}ä%{front%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^VowRM%{eõ%}%>t
!!€ pö00000000e%>t
!! rehksämä+V+Inf/mA:
!!€ reh{kØ}ä{sś}{front}^Pen^StrGStem^Pen^VowRM^NoPAL>{aä}>m{aä}
!!€ rehkäs000000>ä>mä

!  [ Cns: | :Cns | ArchCns:] _ (s:) (HarmDummiesVar) [ (0:) (%^Pen: %^CC2C:) %^VowRM: | CnsInZero: %^VowRM: %^CnsRM:  %> | [%^StrGStem:  ] %> i  ] ; 
    _ (HarmDummiesVar) ((%^Pen: ) %^VOWLower:) (%^Pen: (%^WGStem:|%^StrGStem:)) (%^NoPAL:) %^VowRM: ;
!  [ Cns: | :Cns ] _ (HarmDummiesVar) [ (0:|:0+) %^VowRM: | CnsInZero: %^VowRM: %^CnsRM:  %> | [%^StrGStem:  ] %> i  ] ; 
                        ä _ (HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite %^VowRM:  ;
!!€ jää%{front%}%^VOWRaise%^VowRM%>i
!!€ jä0000%>i
!!€ elä%{front%}%>et
!!€ el00%>et
#  [Cns:| ArchCns: ] _ Cns: (HarmDummiesVar) %^Pen: %^VowRM: ;
!! tütär+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ tütä%{rŕ%}%{front%}%^VowRM%>e
!!€ tüt0r000%>e
 _  [%{hØ%}: | %{sØ%}: ] (HarmDummiesVar) %^VowRM:  ;

"U:0 Vx"
!! **@RULENAME@**
!! ```
 Vx:0 <=> 
  [ Cns: | :Cns |ArchCns:] _ (s:) (HarmDummiesVar)  PenVOWHite (%^Pen: [%^G1:|%^G2:|%^G3:|%^G4:| %^CC2C:|%^StrGStem:|%^ShortGStem:|%^WGStem:]) (%^Pen: %^NoPAL:|%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^VowRM: (õ|e)    ; 
!
!!€ hirnu{back}^Pen^CC2C^VowRM>m{aä}
!!€ hirn00000>ma
!!kutsma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:
!!€ kut{sś}u{back}^Pen^VOWRaise^Pen^PAL^VowRM
!!€ kutś0000000
!!€ tervüs{front}^VowRM^CnsRM>i>t
!!€ terv00000>i>t
!! juusk+N+Sg+Nom: ____
!!€ j{ou}{ou}s{kØ}u{back}^VOWRaise^VowRM
!!€ ju̬u̬sk0000

   OnSetC Vx: _ (HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite (%^Pen: %^CC2C:) (%^NoPAL:|%^PAL:) %^VowRM:  ;
!!€ kuu{back}^VOWLower^VowRM>i>d
!!€ ku0000>i>d
   k ä _ (HarmDummiesVar) %^VowRM:  ;
    _ (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite (%^Pen: %^WGStem:|%^Pen: %^StrGStem: |%^Pen: %^ShortGStem:) (%^NoPAL:) %^VowRM: ;
        where Vx in (u ü) ;
!! ```

!"ü:0"
!!! __@RULENAME@__
!!! {{{
! ü:0 <=>
!  [ Cns: |ArchCns:| Vow: ] _ (s:) (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite [(%^Pen: %^CC2C:|%^Pen: %^G1:|%^Pen: %^G2:|%^Pen: %^G3:|%^Pen: %^G4:|%^Pen: %^StrGStem:|%^Pen: %^ShortGStem:) %^VowRM: | CnsInZero: (%^Pen: %^CC2C:) %^VowRM: %^WGStem: ]  ; 
!!  [ Cns: |ArchCns:| Vow: ] _ (s:) (HarmDummiesVar) [(%^Pen: %^CC2C:|%^Pen: %^G3:|%^Pen: %^G4:|PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^G1:) %^VowRM: ]( CnsInZero: (%^Pen: %^CC2C:) %^VowRM: %^CnsRM: )  ; 
!!€ tüü%{front%}%^VowRM%>hüq
!!€ tü000%>hüq
!!€ tervüs%{front%}%^VowRM%^WGStem%>i%>t
!!€ terv00000%>i%>t
!   OnSetC ü: _ (HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite %> i ;
!    _ (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite (%^Pen: %^WGStem:|%^Pen: %^StrGStem: |%^Pen: %^ShortGStem:) %^VowRM: ;
!    _ (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite (%^Pen: %^G3:|%^Pen: %^G4:) %^VowRM: ;
!!! }}}

"e:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 e:0 <=>  [ Cns: | :Cns |ArchCns:] _ (s:) (HarmDummiesVar) [(%^Pen: %^CC2C:|%^Pen: %^StrGStem:|PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^WGStem:) %^VowRM: | CnsInZero: (%^Pen: %^CC2C:) %^VowRM: %^WGStem: ]  ; 
           [ Cns: | :Cns ] _ [l|r] (HarmDummiesVar) %^Pen: %^VowRM:  ;
           e: _ VOWHite %^VowRM: ;
	   _  [%{hØ%}: | %{sØ%}: ] (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite PenGRAD %^VowRM:  ;
!!€ herne%{hØ%}%{front%}%^VowRM%^WGStem%>id%{eõ%}
!!€ hern00000%>ide
    _ (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite PenGRAD (%^NoPAL:) %^VowRM: ;
!! läteq+N+Pl?Gen: **spring/lähde**
!!€ lä{tØ}te{front}^Pen^VOWRaise^Pen^StrGStem^VowRM>id{eõ}
!!€ lätt0000000>ide

"o:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 o:0 <=>  [ Cns: | :Cns |ArchCns:] _ (s:) (HarmDummiesVar) [ (PenVOWHite (%^Pen: %^NoPAL:|%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: [%^G1:|%^G2:|%^G3:|%^G4:|%^StrGStem:|%^JI2I:|%^JI20:|%^JI2J:]|%^Pen: %^CC2C:) %^VowRM: (õ) ]   ; 
           o: _ (HarmDummiesVar) [VOWHite %^VowRM:|%^OO2Õ:] ;
!! juuma+V+Inf
!!€ j{ou}{ou}{back}^VOWRaise^VowRM>vv>{aä}q
!!€ ju̬0000>vv>aq
    _ (HarmDummiesVar) PenVOWHite (%^Pen: %^WGStem:|%^Pen: %^StrGStem:) (%^NoPAL:) %^VowRM: ;
    _ (HarmDummiesVar) VOWHite  (%^NoPAL:) %^VowRM: ;

!v a {rŕ}:ŕ {jiØ}:0 o:0 {back}:0^Pen:0^PAL:0^Pen:0^JI20:0^VowRM:0>{eõ}:õ
